Utah statutes.
48-1d-1056.   Effect of domestication.

(1)  When a domestication becomes effective:

(a)  the domesticated limited liability partnership is:

(i)  organized under and subject to the organic law of the domesticated limited liability partnership; and

(ii)  the same entity without interruption as the domesticating limited liability partnership;

(b)  all property of the domesticating limited liability partnership continues to be vested in the domesticated entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

(c)  all debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating limited liability partnership continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

(d)  except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of domestication, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating limited liability partnership remain in the domesticated limited liability partnership;

(e)  the name of the domesticated limited liability partnership may be substituted for the name of the domesticating limited liability partnership in any pending action or proceeding;

(f)  the statement of qualification of the domestic limited liability partnership is effective;

(g)  the provisions of the partnership agreement of the domesticated limited liability partnership that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication are effective; and

(h)  the interests in the domesticating limited liability partnership are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the partners of the domesticating limited liability partnership are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any appraisal rights they have under Section 48-1d-1008.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or partnership agreement of the domesticating limited liability partnership, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating limited liability partnership.

(3)  When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the domesticating limited liability partnership and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic limited liability partnership as a result of the domestication has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the domestic limited liability partnership and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

(4)  When a domestication becomes effective:

(a)  The domestication does not discharge any interest holder liability under this part to the extent the interest holder liability arose before the domestication became effective.

(b)  A person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

(c)  A person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by law other than this chapter, or this chapter, or the partnership agreement of a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under Subsection (4)(a) as if the domestication had not occurred.

(5)  When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign limited liability partnership that is the domesticated limited liability partnership may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities as provided in Section 16-17-301.

(6)  If the domesticating limited liability partnership is a registered foreign limited liability partnership, the registration of the foreign limited liability partnership is canceled when the domestication becomes effective.

(7)  A domestication does not require the limited liability partnership to wind up its business and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the limited liability partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

